Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.165

Driveaway-towaway operation.

"Driveaway-towaway operation" means any operation in which any motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer, singly or in combination, new or used, constitutes the commodity being transported when one set or more wheels of any such vehicle are on the roadway during the course of transportation, whether or not any such vehicle furnishes the motive power.

[ 1963 c 154 s 27.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1963 c 154: See note following RCW 46.37.010.